Missouri, session 2026, SB1417.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 337.600, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 337.600,
to read as follows:
337.600. As used in sections 337.600 to 337.689, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Advanced macro social worker", the applications
of social work theory, knowledge, methods, principles,
values, and ethics; and the professional use of self to
community and organizational systems, systemic and macrocosm
issues, and other indirect nonclinical services; specialized
knowledge and advanced practice skills in case management,
information and referral, nonclinical assessments,
counseling, outcome evaluation, mediation, nonclinical
supervision, nonclinical consultation, expert testimony,
education, outcome evaluation, research, advocacy, social
planning and policy development, community organization, and
the development, implementation and administration of
policies, programs, and activities. A licensed advanced
macro social worker may not treat mental or emotional
disorders or provide psychotherapy without the direct
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1417 2
supervision of a licensed clinical social worker, or
diagnose a mental disorder;
(2) "Clinical social work", the application of social
work theory, knowledge, values, methods, principles, and
techniques of case work, group work, client-centered
advocacy, community organization, administration, planning,
evaluation, consultation, research, psychotherapy and
counseling methods and techniques to persons, families and
groups in assessment, diagnosis, treatment, prevention and
amelioration of mental and emotional conditions;
(3) "Committee", the state committee for social
workers established in section 337.622;
(4) "Department", the Missouri department of commerce
and insurance;
(5) "Director", the director of the division of
professional registration;
(6) "Division", the division of professional
registration;
(7) "Independent practice", any practice of social
workers outside of an organized setting such as a social,
medical, or governmental agency in which a social worker
assumes responsibility and accountability for services
required;
(8) "Licensed advanced macro social worker", any
person who offers to render services to individuals, groups,
families, couples, organizations, institutions, communities,
government agencies, corporations, or the general public for
a fee, monetary or otherwise, implying that the person is
trained, experienced, and licensed as an advanced macro
social worker, and who holds a current valid license to
practice as an advanced macro social worker;

SB 1417 3
(9) "Licensed baccalaureate social worker", any person
who offers to render services to individuals, groups,
organizations, institutions, corporations, government
agencies, or the general public for a fee, monetary or
otherwise, implying that the person is trained, experienced,
and licensed as a baccalaureate social worker, and who holds
a current valid license to practice as a baccalaureate
social worker;
(10) "Licensed clinical social worker", any person who
offers to render services to individuals, groups,
organizations, institutions, corporations, government
agencies, or the general public for a fee, monetary or
otherwise, implying that the person is trained, experienced,
and licensed as a clinical social worker, and who holds a
current, valid license to practice as a clinical social
worker;
(11) "Licensed master social worker", any person who
offers to render services to individuals, groups, families,
couples, organizations, institutions, communities,
government agencies, corporations, or the general public for
a fee, monetary or otherwise, implying that the person is
trained, experienced, and licensed as a master social
worker, and who holds a current valid license to practice as
a master social worker. A licensed master social worker may
not treat mental or emotional disorders, provide
psychotherapy without the direct supervision of a licensed
clinical social worker, or diagnose a mental disorder;
(12) "Master social work", the application of social
work theory, knowledge, methods, and ethics and the
professional use of self to restore or enhance social,
psychosocial, or biopsychosocial functioning of individuals,
couples, families, groups, organizations, communities,

SB 1417 4
institutions, government agencies, or corporations. The
practice includes the applications of specialized knowledge
and advanced practice skills in the areas of assessment,
treatment planning, implementation and evaluation, case
management, mediation, information and referral, counseling,
client education, supervision, consultation, education,
research, advocacy, community organization and development,
planning, evaluation, implementation and administration of
policies, programs, and activities. Under supervision as
provided in this section, the practice of master social work
may include the practices reserved to clinical social
workers or advanced macro social workers for no more than
forty-eight consecutive calendar months for the purpose of
obtaining licensure under section 337.615 or 337.645;
(13) "Practice of advanced macro social work",
rendering, offering to render, or supervising those who
render to individuals, couples, families, groups,
organizations, institutions, corporations, government
agencies, communities, or the general public any service
100 involving the application of methods, principles, and
101 techniques of advanced practice macro social work;
102 (14) "Practice of baccalaureate social work",
103 rendering, offering to render, or supervising those who
104 render to individuals, families, groups, organizations,
105 institutions, corporations, or the general public any
106 service involving the application of methods, principles,
107 and techniques of baccalaureate social work;
108 (15) "Practice of clinical social work", rendering,
109 offering to render, or supervising those who render to
110 individuals, couples, groups, organizations, institutions,
111 corporations, or the general public any service involving

SB 1417 5
112 the application of methods, principles, and techniques of
113 clinical social work;
114 (16) "Practice of master social work", rendering,
115 offering to render, or supervising those who render to
116 individuals, couples, families, groups, organizations,
117 institutions, corporations, government agencies,
118 communities, or the general public any service involving the
119 application of methods, principles, and techniques of master
120 social work;
121 (17) "Qualified advanced macro supervisor", any
122 licensed social worker who meets the qualifications of a
123 qualified clinical supervisor or a licensed advanced macro
124 social worker who has:
125 (a) Practiced in the field of social work as a
126 licensed social worker for which he or she is supervising
127 the applicant for a minimum of [five] three years;
128 (b) Successfully completed a minimum of sixteen hours
129 of supervisory training from the Association of Social Work
130 Boards, the National Association of Social Workers, an
131 accredited university, or a program approved by the state
132 committee for social workers. All organizations providing
133 the supervisory training shall adhere to the basic content
134 and quality standards outlined by the state committee on
135 social work; and
136 (c) Met all the requirements of sections 337.600 to
137 337.689, and as defined by rule by the state committee for
138 social workers;
139 (18) "Qualified baccalaureate supervisor", any
140 licensed social worker who meets the qualifications of a
141 qualified clinical supervisor, qualified master supervisor,
142 qualified advanced macro supervisor, or a licensed
143 baccalaureate social worker who has:

SB 1417 6
144 (a) Practiced in the field of social work as a
145 licensed social worker for which he or she is supervising
146 the applicant for a minimum of [five] three years;
147 (b) Successfully completed a minimum of sixteen hours
148 of supervisory training from the Association of Social Work
149 Boards, the National Association of Social Workers, an
150 accredited university, or a program approved by the state
151 committee for social workers. All organizations providing
152 the supervisory training shall adhere to the basic content
153 and quality standards outlined by the state committee on
154 social workers; and
155 (c) Met all the requirements of sections 337.600 to
156 337.689, and as defined by rule by the state committee for
157 social workers;
158 (19) "Qualified clinical supervisor", any licensed
159 clinical social worker who has:
160 (a) Practiced in the field of social work as a
161 licensed social worker for which he or she is supervising
162 the applicant for a minimum of [five] three years;
163 (b) Successfully completed a minimum of sixteen hours
164 of supervisory training from the Association of Social Work
165 Boards, the National Association of Social Workers, an
166 accredited university, or a program approved by the state
167 committee for social workers. All organizations providing
168 the supervisory training shall adhere to the basic content
169 and quality standards outlined by the state committee on
170 social work; and
171 (c) Met all the requirements of sections 337.600 to
172 337.689, and as defined by rule by the state committee for
173 social workers;
174 (20) "Social worker", any individual that has:

SB 1417 7
175 (a) Received a baccalaureate degree in social work
176 from an accredited social work program approved by the
177 Council on Social Work Education;
178 (b) Received a master's degree in social work from a
179 social work program:
180 a. Accredited by the Council on Social Work Education;
181 or
182 b. Recognized and approved by the committee in
183 accordance with rules adopted by the committee under section
184 337.627 and in accordance with the procedure set forth in
185 section 337.628;
186 (c) Received a doctorate or Ph.D. in social work; or
187 (d) A current social worker license as set forth in
188 sections 337.600 to 337.689.
✓